Utah statutes.
70A-2-322.   Delivery "ex-ship."

(1)  Unless otherwise agreed a term for delivery of goods "ex-ship" (which means from the carrying vessel) or in equivalent language is not restricted to a particular ship and requires delivery from  a ship which has reached a place at the named port of destination where goods of the kind are usually discharged.

(2)  Under such a term unless otherwise agreed

(a)  the seller must discharge all liens arising out of the carriage and furnish the buyer with a direction which puts the carrier under a duty to deliver the goods; and

(b)  the risk of loss does not pass to the buyer until the goods leave the ship's tackle or are otherwise properly unloaded.

